~$ ./cuda-qnx-gdb 
NVIDIA (R) CUDA Debugger
11.4 release
Portions Copyright (C) 2007-2021 NVIDIA Corporation
GNU gdb (GDB) 10.1
Copyright (C) 2020 Free Software Foundation, Inc.
License GPLv3+: GNU GPL version 3 or later <http://gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html>
This is free software: you are free to change and redistribute it.
There is NO WARRANTY, to the extent permitted by law.
Type "show copying" and "show warranty" for details.
This GDB was configured as "--host=x86_64-pc-linux-gnu --target=aarch64-elf-nto".
Type "show configuration" for configuration details.
For bug reporting instructions, please see:
<https://www.gnu.org/software/gdb/bugs/>.
Find the GDB manual and other documentation resources online at:
    <http://www.gnu.org/software/gdb/documentation/>.

For help, type "help".
Type "apropos word" to search for commands related to "word".
(cuda-gdb) help all

Command class: aliases

delete autosteps -- Equivalent to ``delete breakpoints''.

Command class: breakpoints

autostep, astep -- Set an autostep for a given window.
awatch -- Set a watchpoint for an expression.
break, brea, bre, br, b -- Set breakpoint at specified location.
break-range -- Set a breakpoint for an address range.
catch -- Set catchpoints to catch events.
catch assert -- Catch failed Ada assertions, when raised.
catch catch -- Catch an exception, when caught.
catch exception -- Catch Ada exceptions, when raised.
catch exec -- Catch calls to exec.
catch fork -- Catch calls to fork.
catch handlers -- Catch Ada exceptions, when handled.
catch load -- Catch loads of shared libraries.
catch rethrow -- Catch an exception, when rethrown.
catch signal -- Catch signals by their names and/or numbers.
catch syscall -- Catch system calls by their names, groups and/or numbers.
catch throw -- Catch an exception, when thrown.
catch unload -- Catch unloads of shared libraries.
catch vfork -- Catch calls to vfork.
clear, cl -- Clear breakpoint at specified location.
commands -- Set commands to be executed when the given breakpoints are hit.
condition -- Specify breakpoint number N to break only if COND is true.
delete, del, d -- Delete all or some breakpoints.
delete autosteps -- Equivalent to ``delete breakpoints''.
delete bookmark -- Delete a bookmark from the bookmark list.
delete breakpoints -- Delete all or some breakpoints or auto-display expressions.
delete display -- Cancel some expressions to be displayed when program stops.
delete mem -- Delete memory region.
delete tracepoints, delete tr -- Delete specified tracepoints.
delete tvariable -- Delete one or more trace state variables.
disable, disa, dis -- Disable all or some breakpoints.
disable breakpoints -- Disable all or some breakpoints.
disable display -- Disable some expressions to be displayed when program stops.
disable frame-filter -- GDB command to disable the specified frame-filter.
disable mem -- Disable memory region.
disable pretty-printer -- GDB command to disable the specified pretty-printer.
disable probes -- Disable probes.
disable type-printer -- GDB command to disable the specified type-printer.
disable unwinder -- GDB command to disable the specified unwinder.
disable xmethod -- GDB command to disable a specified (group of) xmethod(s).
dprintf -- Set a dynamic printf at specified location.
enable, en -- Enable all or some breakpoints.
enable breakpoints -- Enable all or some breakpoints.
enable breakpoints count -- Enable some breakpoints for COUNT hits.
enable breakpoints delete -- Enable some breakpoints and delete when hit.
enable breakpoints once -- Enable some breakpoints for one hit.
enable count -- Enable some breakpoints for COUNT hits.
enable delete -- Enable some breakpoints and delete when hit.
enable display -- Enable some expressions to be displayed when program stops.
enable frame-filter -- GDB command to enable the specified frame-filter.
enable mem -- Enable memory region.
enable once -- Enable some breakpoints for one hit.
enable pretty-printer -- GDB command to enable the specified pretty-printer.
enable probes -- Enable probes.
enable type-printer -- GDB command to enable the specified type printer.
enable unwinder -- GDB command to enable unwinders.
enable xmethod -- GDB command to enable a specified (group of) xmethod(s).
ftrace -- Set a fast tracepoint at specified location.
hbreak -- Set a hardware assisted breakpoint.
ignore -- Set ignore-count of breakpoint number N to COUNT.
rbreak -- Set a breakpoint for all functions matching REGEXP.
rwatch -- Set a read watchpoint for an expression.
save -- Save breakpoint definitions as a script.
save breakpoints -- Save current breakpoint definitions as a script.
save gdb-index -- Save a gdb-index file.
save tracepoints, save-tracepoints -- Save current tracepoint definitions as a script.
skip -- Ignore a function while stepping.
skip delete -- Delete skip entries.
skip disable -- Disable skip entries.
skip enable -- Enable skip entries.
skip file -- Ignore a file while stepping.
skip function -- Ignore a function while stepping.
strace -- Set a static tracepoint at location or marker.
tbreak -- Set a temporary breakpoint.
tcatch -- Set temporary catchpoints to catch events.
tcatch assert -- Catch failed Ada assertions, when raised.
tcatch catch -- Catch an exception, when caught.
tcatch exception -- Catch Ada exceptions, when raised.
tcatch exec -- Catch calls to exec.
tcatch fork -- Catch calls to fork.
tcatch handlers -- Catch Ada exceptions, when handled.
tcatch load -- Catch loads of shared libraries.
tcatch rethrow -- Catch an exception, when rethrown.
tcatch signal -- Catch signals by their names and/or numbers.
tcatch syscall -- Catch system calls by their names, groups and/or numbers.
tcatch throw -- Catch an exception, when thrown.
tcatch unload -- Catch unloads of shared libraries.
tcatch vfork -- Catch calls to vfork.
thbreak -- Set a temporary hardware assisted breakpoint.
trace, trac, tra, tr, tp -- Set a tracepoint at specified location.
watch -- Set a watchpoint for an expression.

Command class: cuda 

cuda -- Print or select the CUDA focus.
cuda block -- Print or select the current CUDA block.
cuda device -- Print or select the current CUDA device.
cuda grid -- Print or select the current CUDA grid.
cuda kernel -- Print or select the current CUDA kernel.
cuda lane -- Print or select the current CUDA lane.
cuda sm -- Print or select the current CUDA SM.
cuda thread -- Print or select the current CUDA thread.
cuda warp -- Print or select the current CUDA warp.

Command class: data

agent-printf -- Target agent only formatted printing, like the C "printf" function.
append -- Append target code/data to a local file.
append binary -- Append target code/data to a raw binary file.
append binary memory -- Append contents of memory to a raw binary file.
append binary value -- Append the value of an expression to a raw binary file.
append memory -- Append contents of memory to a raw binary file.
append value -- Append the value of an expression to a raw binary file.
call -- Call a function in the program.
disassemble -- Disassemble a specified section of memory.
display -- Print value of expression EXP each time the program stops.
dump -- Dump target code/data to a local file.
dump binary -- Write target code/data to a raw binary file.
dump binary memory -- Write contents of memory to a raw binary file.
dump binary value -- Write the value of an expression to a raw binary file.
dump ihex -- Write target code/data to an intel hex file.
dump ihex memory -- Write contents of memory to an ihex file.
dump ihex value -- Write the value of an expression to an ihex file.
dump memory -- Write contents of memory to a raw binary file.
dump srec -- Write target code/data to an srec file.
dump srec memory -- Write contents of memory to an srec file.
dump srec value -- Write the value of an expression to an srec file.
dump tekhex -- Write target code/data to a tekhex file.
dump tekhex memory -- Write contents of memory to a tekhex file.
dump tekhex value -- Write the value of an expression to a tekhex file.
dump value -- Write the value of an expression to a raw binary file.
dump verilog -- Write target code/data to a verilog hex file.
dump verilog memory -- Write contents of memory to a verilog hex file.
dump verilog value -- Write the value of an expression to a verilog hex file.
explore -- Explore a value or a type valid in the current context.
explore type -- Explore a type or the type of an expression.
explore value -- Explore value of an expression valid in the current context.
find -- Search memory for a sequence of bytes.
init-if-undefined -- Initialize a convenience variable if necessary.
map -- Maps values in collection EXP using function FUNCTION.
mem -- Define attributes for memory region or reset memory region handling to target-based.
output -- Like "print" but don't put in value history and don't print newline.
print, inspect, p -- Print value of expression EXP.
print-object, po -- Ask an Objective-C object to print itself.
printf -- Formatted printing, like the C "printf" function.
ptype -- Print definition of type TYPE.
restore -- Restore the contents of FILE to target memory.
set -- Evaluate expression EXP and assign result to variable VAR.
set ada -- Prefix command for changing Ada-specific settings.
set ada print-signatures -- Enable or disable the output of formal and return types for functions in the overloads selection menu.
set ada trust-PAD-over-XVS -- Enable or disable an optimization trusting PAD types over XVS types.
set agent -- Set debugger's willingness to use agent as a helper.
set annotate -- Set annotation_level.
set architecture, set processor -- Set architecture of target.
set args -- Set argument list to give program being debugged when it is started.
set arm -- Various ARM-specific commands.
set arm abi -- Set the ABI.
set arm apcs32 -- Set usage of ARM 32-bit mode.
set arm disassembler -- Set the disassembly style.
set arm fallback-mode -- Set the mode assumed when symbols are unavailable.
set arm force-mode -- Set the mode assumed even when symbols are available.
set arm fpu -- Set the floating point type.
set auto-connect-native-target -- Set whether GDB may automatically connect to the native target.
set auto-load -- Auto-loading specific settings.
set auto-load gdb-scripts -- Enable or disable auto-loading of canned sequences of commands scripts.
set auto-load local-gdbinit -- Enable or disable auto-loading of .gdbinit script in current directory.
set auto-load python-scripts -- Set the debugger's behaviour regarding auto-loaded Python scripts.
set auto-load safe-path -- Set the list of files and directories that are safe for auto-loading.
set auto-load scripts-directory -- Set the list of directories from which to load auto-loaded scripts.
set auto-solib-add -- Set autoloading of shared library symbols.
set backtrace -- Set backtrace specific variables.
set backtrace limit -- Set an upper bound on the number of backtrace levels.
set backtrace past-entry -- Set whether backtraces should continue past the entry point of a program.
set backtrace past-main -- Set whether backtraces should continue past "main".
set basenames-may-differ -- Set whether a source file may have multiple base names.
set breakpoint -- Breakpoint specific settings.
set breakpoint always-inserted -- Set mode for inserting breakpoints.
set breakpoint auto-hw -- Set automatic usage of hardware breakpoints.
set breakpoint condition-evaluation -- Set mode of breakpoint condition evaluation.
set breakpoint conditional-pending -- Set debugger's behavior regarding pending breakpoints conditionals.
set breakpoint pending -- Set debugger's behavior regarding pending breakpoints.
set can-use-hw-watchpoints -- Set debugger's willingness to use watchpoint hardware.
set case-sensitive -- Set case sensitivity in name search (on/off/auto).
set charset -- Set the host and target character sets.
set check, set ch, set c -- Set the status of the type/range checker.
set check range -- Set range checking (on/warn/off/auto).
set check type -- Set strict type checking.
set circular-trace-buffer -- Set target's use of circular trace buffer.
set code-cache -- Set cache use for code segment access.
set coerce-float-to-double -- Set coercion of floats to doubles when calling functions.
set compile-args -- Set compile command GCC command-line arguments.
set compile-gcc -- Set compile command GCC driver filename.
set complaints -- Set max number of complaints about incorrect symbols.
set confirm -- Set whether to confirm potentially dangerous operations.
set cp-abi -- Set the ABI used for inspecting C++ objects.
set cuda -- Generic command for setting gdb cuda variables
set cuda api_failures -- Set the api_failures to ignore/stop/hide on CUDA driver API call errors.
set cuda break_on_launch -- Automatically set a breakpoint at the entrance of kernels.
set cuda coalescing -- Turn on/off coalescing of the CUDA commands output.
set cuda collect_stats -- Turn on/off CUDA Debugger API statistics collection
set cuda context_events -- Turn on/off context events (push/pop/create/destroy) output messages.
set cuda device_resume_on_cpu_dynamic_function_call -- Turn on/off resuming device during dynamic function call on host
set cuda disassemble_from -- Choose whether to disassemble from the device memory (slow) or the ELF image (fast).
set cuda disassemble_per -- Choose whether to disassemble a function at a time (fast) or file at a time (slow).
set cuda gpu_busy_check -- Turn on/off GPU busy check the next time the inferior application is run. (Mac only)
set cuda hide_internal_frame -- Set hiding of the internal CUDA frames when printing the call stack
set cuda kernel_events -- Turn on/off kernel events (launch/termination) output messages.
set cuda kernel_events_depth -- Set the maximum depth of nested kernels event notifications.
set cuda launch_blocking -- Turn on/off CUDA kernel launch blocking (effective starting from the next run)
set cuda memcheck -- Turn on/off CUDA Memory Checker next time the inferior application is run.
set cuda notify -- Thread to notify about CUDA events when no other known candidate.
set cuda ptx_cache -- Turn on/off GPU variable value cache
set cuda single_stepping_optimizations -- Turn on/off CUDA single-stepping optimizations
set cuda software_preemption -- Turn on/off CUDA software preemption debugging the next time the inferior application is run.
set cuda stop_signal -- Set signal used to notify the debugger of the CUDA event
set cuda thread_selection -- Set the automatic thread selection policy to use when the current thread cannot be selected.
set cuda value_extrapolation -- Turn on/off CUDA register value extrapolation
set cwd -- Set the current working directory to be used when the inferior is started.
set data-directory -- Set GDB's data directory.
set dcache -- Use this command to set number of lines in dcache and line-size.
set dcache line-size -- Set dcache line size in bytes (must be power of 2).
set dcache size -- Set number of dcache lines.
set debug -- Generic command for setting gdb debugging flags.
set debug aarch64 -- Set AArch64 debugging.
set debug arch -- Set architecture debugging.
set debug arm -- Set ARM debugging.
set debug auto-load -- Set auto-load verifications debugging.
set debug bfd-cache -- Set bfd cache debugging.
set debug check-physname -- Set cross-checking of "physname" code against demangler.
set debug coff-pe-read -- Set coff PE read debugging.
set debug compile -- Set compile command debugging.
set debug compile-cplus-scopes -- Set debugging of C++ compile scopes.
set debug compile-cplus-types -- Set debugging of C++ compile type conversion.
set debug cuda -- Generic command for setting gdb cuda debugging flags
set debug cuda convenience_vars -- Set use of extra convenience variables used for debugging.
set debug cuda libcudbg -- Set debug trace of the CUDA RPC client functions
set debug cuda notifications -- Set debug trace of the CUDA notification functions
set debug cuda strict -- Set debugger execution mode to normal or strict.
set debug cuda trace -- Set debug trace of the internal CUDA-specific functions
set debug displaced -- Set displaced stepping debugging.
set debug dwarf-die -- Set debugging of the DWARF DIE reader.
set debug dwarf-line -- Set debugging of the dwarf line reader.
set debug dwarf-read -- Set debugging of the DWARF reader.
set debug entry-values -- Set entry values and tail call frames debugging.
set debug expression -- Set expression debugging.
set debug fortran-array-slicing -- Set debugging of Fortran array slicing.
set debug frame -- Set frame debugging.
set debug index-cache -- Set display of index-cache debug messages.
set debug infrun -- Set inferior debugging.
set debug jit -- Set JIT debugging.
set debug notification -- Set debugging of async remote notification.
set debug nto-debug -- Set QNX NTO internal debugging.
set debug observer -- Set observer debugging.
set debug overload -- Set debugging of C++ overloading.
set debug parser -- Set parser debugging.
set debug py-unwind -- Set Python unwinder debugging.
set debug record -- Set debugging of record/replay feature.
set debug remote -- Set debugging of remote protocol.
set debug remote-packet-max-chars -- Set the maximum number of characters to display for each remote packet.
set debug separate-debug-file -- Set printing of separate debug info file search debug.
set debug serial -- Set serial debugging.
set debug skip -- Set whether to print the debug output about skipping files and functions.
set debug stap-expression -- Set SystemTap expression debugging.
set debug symbol-lookup -- Set debugging of symbol lookup.
set debug symfile -- Set debugging of the symfile functions.
set debug symtab-create -- Set debugging of symbol table creation.
set debug target -- Set target debugging.
set debug timestamp -- Set timestamping of debugging messages.
set debug varobj -- Set varobj debugging.
set debug xml -- Set XML parser debugging.
set debug-file-directory -- Set the directories where separate debug symbols are searched for.
set default-collect -- Set the list of expressions to collect by default.
set demangle-style -- Set the current C++ demangling style.
set detach-on-fork -- Set whether gdb will detach the child of a fork.
set directories -- Set the search path for finding source files.
set disable-randomization -- Set disabling of debuggee's virtual address space randomization.
set disassemble-next-line -- Set whether to disassemble next source line or insn when execution stops.
set disassembler-options -- Set the disassembler options.
set disconnected-dprintf -- Set whether dprintf continues after GDB disconnects.
set disconnected-tracing -- Set whether tracing continues after GDB disconnects.
set displaced-stepping -- Set debugger's willingness to use displaced stepping.
set dprintf-channel -- Set the channel to use for dynamic printf.
set dprintf-function -- Set the function to use for dynamic printf.
set dprintf-style -- Set the style of usage for dynamic printf.
set dump-excluded-mappings -- Set whether gcore should dump mappings marked with the VM_DONTDUMP flag.
set editing -- Set editing of command lines as they are typed.
set endian -- Set endianness of target.
set environment -- Set environment variable value to give the program.
set exec-direction -- Set direction of execution.
set exec-done-display -- Set notification of completion for asynchronous execution commands.
set exec-file-mismatch -- Set exec-file-mismatch handling (ask|warn|off).
set extended-prompt -- Set the extended prompt.
set extension-language -- Set mapping between filename extension and source language.
set filename-display -- Set how to display filenames.
set follow-exec-mode -- Set debugger response to a program call of exec.
set follow-fork-mode -- Set debugger response to a program call of fork or vfork.
set fortran -- Prefix command for changing Fortran-specific settings.
set fortran repack-array-slices -- Enable or disable repacking of non-contiguous array slices.
set frame-filter -- Prefix command for 'set' frame-filter related operations.
set frame-filter priority -- GDB command to set the priority of the specified frame-filter.
set gnutarget, set g -- Set the current BFD target.
set guile, set gu -- Prefix command for Guile preference settings.
set guile print-stack -- Set mode for Guile exception printing on error.
set height -- Set number of lines in a page for GDB output pagination.
set history -- Generic command for setting command history parameters.
set history expansion -- Set history expansion on command input.
set history filename -- Set the filename in which to record the command history.
set history remove-duplicates -- Set how far back in history to look for and remove duplicate entries.
set history save -- Set saving of the history record on exit.
set history size -- Set the size of the command history.
set host-charset -- Set the host character set.
set index-cache -- Set index-cache options.
set index-cache directory -- Set the directory of the index cache.
set index-cache off -- Disable the index cache.
set index-cache on -- Enable the index cache.
set inferior-tty, tty -- Set terminal for future runs of program being debugged.
set input-radix -- Set default input radix for entering numbers.
set interactive-mode -- Set whether GDB's standard input is a terminal.
set language -- Set the current source language.
set listsize -- Set number of source lines gdb will list by default.
set logging -- Set logging options.
set logging debugredirect -- Set the logging debug output mode.
set logging file -- Set the current logfile.
set logging off -- Disable logging.
set logging on -- Enable logging.
set logging overwrite -- Set whether logging overwrites or appends to the log file.
set logging redirect -- Set the logging output mode.
set max-completions -- Set maximum number of completion candidates.
set max-user-call-depth -- Set the max call depth for non-python/scheme user-defined commands.
set max-value-size -- Set maximum sized value gdb will load from the inferior.
set may-call-functions -- Set permission to call functions in the program.
set may-insert-breakpoints -- Set permission to insert breakpoints in the target.
set may-insert-fast-tracepoints -- Set permission to insert fast tracepoints in the target.
set may-insert-tracepoints -- Set permission to insert tracepoints in the target.
set may-interrupt -- Set permission to interrupt or signal the target.
set may-write-memory -- Set permission to write into target memory.
set may-write-registers -- Set permission to write into registers.
set mem -- Memory regions settings.
set mem inaccessible-by-default -- Set handling of unknown memory regions.
set mi-async, set target-async -- Set whether MI asynchronous mode is enabled.
set multiple-symbols -- Set how the debugger handles ambiguities in expressions.
set non-stop -- Set whether gdb controls the inferior in non-stop mode.
set nto-cwd -- Set the working directory for the remote process.
set nto-executable -- Set the binary to be executed on the remote QNX Neutrino target.
set nto-inherit-env -- Set if the inferior should inherit environment from pdebug or gdb.
set nto-stop-on-thread-events -- Stop on thread events .
set nto-timeout -- Set timeout value for communication with the remote.
set observer -- Set whether gdb controls the inferior in observer mode.
set opaque-type-resolution -- Set resolution of opaque struct/class/union types (if set before loading symbols).
set osabi -- Set OS ABI of target.
set output-radix -- Set default output radix for printing of values.
set overload-resolution -- Set overload resolution in evaluating C++ functions.
set pagination -- Set state of GDB output pagination.
set print, set pr, set p -- Generic command for setting how things print.
set print address -- Set printing of addresses.
set print array -- Set pretty formatting of arrays.
set print array-indexes -- Set printing of array indexes.
set print asm-demangle -- Set demangling of C++/ObjC names in disassembly listings.
set print demangle -- Set demangling of encoded C++/ObjC names when displaying symbols.
set print elements -- Set limit on string chars or array elements to print.
set print entry-values -- Set printing of function arguments at function entry.
set print finish -- Set whether `finish' prints the return value.
set print frame-arguments -- Set printing of non-scalar frame arguments.
set print frame-info -- Set printing of frame information.
set print inferior-events -- Set printing of inferior events (such as inferior start and exit).
set print max-depth -- Set maximum print depth for nested structures, unions and arrays.
set print max-symbolic-offset -- Set the largest offset that will be printed in <SYMBOL+1234> form.
set print null-stop -- Set printing of char arrays to stop at first null char.
set print object -- Set printing of C++ virtual function tables.
set print pascal_static-members -- Set printing of pascal static members.
set print pretty -- Set pretty formatting of structures.
set print raw-frame-arguments -- Set whether to print frame arguments in raw form.
set print raw-values -- Set whether to print values in raw form.
set print repeats -- Set threshold for repeated print elements.
set print sevenbit-strings -- Set printing of 8-bit characters in strings as \nnn.
set print static-members -- Set printing of C++ static members.
set print symbol -- Set printing of symbol names when printing pointers.
set print symbol-filename -- Set printing of source filename and line number with <SYMBOL>.
set print symbol-loading -- Set printing of symbol loading messages.
set print thread-events -- Set printing of thread events (such as thread start and exit).
set print type -- Generic command for setting how types print.
set print type methods -- Set printing of methods defined in classes.
set print type nested-type-limit -- Set the number of recursive nested type definitions to print ("unlimited" or -1 to show all).
set print type typedefs -- Set printing of typedefs defined in classes.
set print union -- Set printing of unions interior to structures.
set print vtbl -- Set printing of C++ virtual function tables.
set prompt -- Set gdb's prompt.
set python -- Prefix command for python preference settings.
set python print-stack -- Set mode for Python stack dump on error.
set radix -- Set default input and output number radices.
set range-stepping -- Enable or disable range stepping.
set ravenscar -- Prefix command for changing Ravenscar-specific settings.
set ravenscar task-switching -- Enable or disable support for GNAT Ravenscar tasks.
set record, set rec -- Set record options.
set record btrace -- Set record options.
set record btrace bts -- Set record btrace bts options.
set record btrace bts buffer-size -- Set the record/replay bts buffer size.
set record btrace cpu -- Set the cpu to be used for trace decode.
set record btrace cpu auto -- Automatically determine the cpu to be used for trace decode.
set record btrace cpu none -- Do not enable errata workarounds for trace decode.
set record btrace pt -- Set record btrace pt options.
set record btrace pt buffer-size -- Set the record/replay pt buffer size.
set record btrace replay-memory-access -- Set what memory accesses are allowed during replay.
set record full -- Set record options.
set record full insn-number-max, set record insn-number-max -- Set record/replay buffer limit.
set record full memory-query, set record memory-query -- Set whether query if PREC cannot record memory change of next instruction.
set record full stop-at-limit, set record stop-at-limit -- Set whether record/replay stops when record/replay buffer becomes full.
set record function-call-history-size -- Set number of function to print in "record function-call-history".
set record instruction-history-size -- Set number of instructions to print in "record instruction-history".
set remote -- Remote protocol specific variables.
set remote CUDAVersion-packet-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `CUDAVersion packet' (CUDAVersion-packet) packet.
set remote TracepointSource-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `TracepointSource' (TracepointSource) packet.
set remote Z-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `Z' packets.
set remote access-watchpoint-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `Z4' (access-watchpoint) packet.
set remote agent-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QAgent' (agent) packet.
set remote allow-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QAllow' (allow) packet.
set remote attach-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vAttach' (attach) packet.
set remote binary-download-packet, set remote X-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `X' (binary-download) packet.
set remote breakpoint-commands-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `BreakpointCommands' (breakpoint-commands) packet.
set remote btrace-conf-bts-size-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `Qbtrace-conf:bts:size' (btrace-conf-bts-size) packet.
set remote btrace-conf-pt-size-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `Qbtrace-conf:pt:size' (btrace-conf-pt-size) packet.
set remote catch-syscalls-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QCatchSyscalls' (catch-syscalls) packet.
set remote conditional-breakpoints-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `ConditionalBreakpoints' (conditional-breakpoints) packet.
set remote conditional-tracepoints-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `ConditionalTracepoints' (conditional-tracepoints) packet.
set remote ctrl-c-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vCtrlC' (ctrl-c) packet.
set remote disable-btrace-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `Qbtrace:off' (disable-btrace) packet.
set remote disable-randomization-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QDisableRandomization' (disable-randomization) packet.
set remote enable-btrace-bts-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `Qbtrace:bts' (enable-btrace-bts) packet.
set remote enable-btrace-pt-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `Qbtrace:pt' (enable-btrace-pt) packet.
set remote environment-hex-encoded-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QEnvironmentHexEncoded' (environment-hex-encoded) packet.
set remote environment-reset-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QEnvironmentReset' (environment-reset) packet.
set remote environment-unset-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QEnvironmentUnset' (environment-unset) packet.
set remote exec-event-feature-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `exec-event-feature' (exec-event-feature) packet.
set remote exec-file -- Set the remote pathname for "run".
set remote fast-tracepoints-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `FastTracepoints' (fast-tracepoints) packet.
set remote fetch-register-packet, set remote p-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `p' (fetch-register) packet.
set remote fork-event-feature-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `fork-event-feature' (fork-event-feature) packet.
set remote get-thread-information-block-address-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qGetTIBAddr' (get-thread-information-block-address) packet.
set remote get-thread-local-storage-address-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qGetTLSAddr' (get-thread-local-storage-address) packet.
set remote hardware-breakpoint-limit -- Set the maximum number of target hardware breakpoints.
set remote hardware-breakpoint-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `Z1' (hardware-breakpoint) packet.
set remote hardware-watchpoint-length-limit -- Set the maximum length (in bytes) of a target hardware watchpoint.
set remote hardware-watchpoint-limit -- Set the maximum number of target hardware watchpoints.
set remote hostio-close-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vFile:close' (hostio-close) packet.
set remote hostio-fstat-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vFile:fstat' (hostio-fstat) packet.
set remote hostio-open-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vFile:open' (hostio-open) packet.
set remote hostio-pread-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vFile:pread' (hostio-pread) packet.
set remote hostio-pwrite-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vFile:pwrite' (hostio-pwrite) packet.
set remote hostio-readlink-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vFile:readlink' (hostio-readlink) packet.
set remote hostio-setfs-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vFile:setfs' (hostio-setfs) packet.
set remote hostio-unlink-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vFile:unlink' (hostio-unlink) packet.
set remote hwbreak-feature-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `hwbreak-feature' (hwbreak-feature) packet.
set remote install-in-trace-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `InstallInTrace' (install-in-trace) packet.
set remote interrupt-on-connect -- Set whether interrupt-sequence is sent to remote target when gdb connects to.
set remote interrupt-sequence -- Set interrupt sequence to remote target.
set remote kill-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vKill' (kill) packet.
set remote library-info-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:libraries:read' (library-info) packet.
set remote library-info-svr4-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:libraries-svr4:read' (library-info-svr4) packet.
set remote memory-map-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:memory-map:read' (memory-map) packet.
set remote memory-read-packet-size -- Set the maximum number of bytes per memory-read packet.
set remote memory-write-packet-size -- Set the maximum number of bytes per memory-write packet.
set remote multiprocess-feature-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `multiprocess-feature' (multiprocess-feature) packet.
set remote no-resumed-stop-reply-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `N stop reply' (no-resumed-stop-reply) packet.
set remote noack-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QStartNoAckMode' (noack) packet.
set remote osdata-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:osdata:read' (osdata) packet.
set remote pass-signals-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QPassSignals' (pass-signals) packet.
set remote pid-to-exec-file-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:exec-file:read' (pid-to-exec-file) packet.
set remote program-signals-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QProgramSignals' (program-signals) packet.
set remote query-attached-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qAttached' (query-attached) packet.
set remote read-aux-vector-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:auxv:read' (read-aux-vector) packet.
set remote read-btrace-conf-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:btrace-conf' (read-btrace-conf) packet.
set remote read-btrace-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:btrace' (read-btrace) packet.
set remote read-fdpic-loadmap-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:fdpic:read' (read-fdpic-loadmap) packet.
set remote read-sdata-object-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:statictrace:read' (read-sdata-object) packet.
set remote read-siginfo-object-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:siginfo:read' (read-siginfo-object) packet.
set remote read-watchpoint-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `Z3' (read-watchpoint) packet.
set remote reverse-continue-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `bc' (reverse-continue) packet.
set remote reverse-step-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `bs' (reverse-step) packet.
set remote run-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vRun' (run) packet.
set remote search-memory-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qSearch:memory' (search-memory) packet.
set remote set-register-packet, set remote P-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `P' (set-register) packet.
set remote set-working-dir-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QSetWorkingDir' (set-working-dir) packet.
set remote software-breakpoint-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `Z0' (software-breakpoint) packet.
set remote startup-with-shell-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QStartupWithShell' (startup-with-shell) packet.
set remote static-tracepoints-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `StaticTracepoints' (static-tracepoints) packet.
set remote supported-packets-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qSupported' (supported-packets) packet.
set remote swbreak-feature-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `swbreak-feature' (swbreak-feature) packet.
set remote symbol-lookup-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qSymbol' (symbol-lookup) packet.
set remote system-call-allowed -- Set if the host system(3) call is allowed for the target.
set remote target-features-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:features:read' (target-features) packet.
set remote thread-events-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QThreadEvents' (thread-events) packet.
set remote threads-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:threads:read' (threads) packet.
set remote trace-buffer-size-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `QTBuffer:size' (trace-buffer-size) packet.
set remote trace-status-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qTStatus' (trace-status) packet.
set remote traceframe-info-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:traceframe-info:read' (traceframe-info) packet.
set remote unwind-info-block-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:uib:read' (unwind-info-block) packet.
set remote verbose-resume-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vCont' (verbose-resume) packet.
set remote verbose-resume-supported-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vContSupported' (verbose-resume-supported) packet.
set remote vfork-event-feature-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `vfork-event-feature' (vfork-event-feature) packet.
set remote write-siginfo-object-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `qXfer:siginfo:write' (write-siginfo-object) packet.
set remote write-watchpoint-packet -- Set use of remote protocol `Z2' (write-watchpoint) packet.
set remoteaddresssize -- Set the maximum size of the address (in bits) in a memory packet.
set remotecache -- Set cache use for remote targets.
set remoteflow -- Set use of hardware flow control for remote serial I/O.
set remotelogbase -- Set numerical base for remote session logging.
set remotelogfile -- Set filename for remote session recording.
set remotetimeout -- Set timeout limit to wait for target to respond.
set remotewritesize -- Set the maximum number of bytes per memory write packet (deprecated).
set schedule-multiple -- Set mode for resuming threads of all processes.
set scheduler-locking -- Set mode for locking scheduler during execution.
set script-extension -- Set mode for script filename extension recognition.
set serial -- Set default serial/parallel port configuration.
set serial baud -- Set baud rate for remote serial I/O.
set serial parity -- Set parity for remote serial I/O.
set solib-search-path -- Set the search path for loading non-absolute shared library symbol files.
set stack-cache -- Set cache use for stack access.
set step-mode -- Set mode of the step operation.
set stop-on-solib-events -- Set stopping for shared library events.
set style -- Style-specific settings.
set style address -- Address display styling.
set style address background -- Set the background color for this property.
set style address foreground -- Set the foreground color for this property.
set style address intensity -- Set the display intensity for this property.
set style enabled -- Set whether CLI styling is enabled.
set style filename -- Filename display styling.
set style filename background -- Set the background color for this property.
set style filename foreground -- Set the foreground color for this property.
set style filename intensity -- Set the display intensity for this property.
set style function -- Function name display styling.
set style function background -- Set the background color for this property.
set style function foreground -- Set the foreground color for this property.
set style function intensity -- Set the display intensity for this property.
set style highlight -- Highlight display styling.
set style highlight background -- Set the background color for this property.
set style highlight foreground -- Set the foreground color for this property.
set style highlight intensity -- Set the display intensity for this property.
set style metadata -- Metadata display styling.
set style metadata background -- Set the background color for this property.
set style metadata foreground -- Set the foreground color for this property.
set style metadata intensity -- Set the display intensity for this property.
set style sources -- Set whether source code styling is enabled.
set style title -- Title display styling.
set style title background -- Set the background color for this property.
set style title foreground -- Set the foreground color for this property.
set style title intensity -- Set the display intensity for this property.
set style tui-active-border -- TUI active border display styling.
set style tui-active-border background -- Set the background color for this property.
set style tui-active-border foreground -- Set the foreground color for this property.
set style tui-border -- TUI border display styling.
set style tui-border background -- Set the background color for this property.
set style tui-border foreground -- Set the foreground color for this property.
set style variable -- Variable name display styling.
set style variable background -- Set the background color for this property.
set style variable foreground -- Set the foreground color for this property.
set style variable intensity -- Set the display intensity for this property.
set substitute-path -- Add a substitution rule to rewrite the source directories.
set sysroot, set solib-absolute-prefix -- Set an alternate system root.
set target-charset -- Set the target character set.
set target-file-system-kind -- Set assumed file system kind for target reported file names.
set target-wide-charset -- Set the target wide character set.
set tcp -- TCP protocol specific variables.
set tcp auto-retry -- Set auto-retry on socket connect.
set tcp connect-timeout -- Set timeout limit in seconds for socket connection.
set tdesc -- Set target description specific variables.
set tdesc filename -- Set the file to read for an XML target description.
set trace-buffer-size -- Set requested size of trace buffer.
set trace-commands -- Set tracing of GDB CLI commands.
set trace-notes -- Set notes string to use for current and future trace runs.
set trace-stop-notes -- Set notes string to use for future tstop commands.
set trace-user -- Set the user name to use for current and future trace runs.
set trust-readonly-sections -- Set mode for reading from readonly sections.
set unwind-on-terminating-exception -- Set unwinding of stack if std::terminate is called while in call dummy.
set unwindonsignal -- Set unwinding of stack if a signal is received while in a call dummy.
set upload-sets-exec -- Set the flag for upload to set nto-executable.
set use-coredump-filter -- Set whether gcore should consider /proc/PID/coredump_filter.
set use-deprecated-index-sections -- Set whether to use deprecated gdb_index sections.
set variable, set var -- Evaluate expression EXP and assign result to variable VAR.
set varsize-limit -- Set the maximum number of bytes allowed in a variable-size object.
set verbose -- Set verbosity.
set watchdog -- Set watchdog timer.
set width -- Set number of characters where GDB should wrap lines of its output.
set write -- Set writing into executable and core files.
undisplay -- Cancel some expressions to be displayed when program stops.
whatis -- Print data type of expression EXP.
with, w -- Temporarily set SETTING to VALUE, run COMMAND, and restore SETTING.
x -- Examine memory: x/FMT ADDRESS.

Command class: files

add-symbol-file -- Load symbols from FILE, assuming FILE has been dynamically loaded.
add-symbol-file-from-memory -- Load the symbols out of memory from a dynamically loaded object file.
cd -- Set working directory to DIR for debugger.
core-file -- Use FILE as core dump for examining memory and registers.
directory -- Add directory DIR to beginning of search path for source files.
edit -- Edit specified file or function.
exec-file -- Use FILE as program for getting contents of pure memory.
file -- Use FILE as program to be debugged.
forward-search, fo, search -- Search for regular expression (see regex(3)) from last line listed.
generate-core-file, gcore -- Save a core file with the current state of the debugged process.
list, l -- List specified function or line.
load -- Dynamically load FILE into the running program.
nosharedlibrary -- Unload all shared object library symbols.
path -- Add directory DIR(s) to beginning of search path for object files.
pwd -- Print working directory.
remote -- Manipulate files on the remote system.
remote delete -- Delete a remote file.
remote get -- Copy a remote file to the local system.
remote put -- Copy a local file to the remote system.
remove-symbol-file -- Remove a symbol file added via the add-symbol-file command.
reverse-search, rev -- Search backward for regular expression (see regex(3)) from last line listed.
section -- Change the base address of section SECTION of the exec file to ADDR.
sharedlibrary -- Load shared object library symbols for files matching REGEXP.
symbol-file -- Load symbol table from executable file FILE.

Command class: internals

flushregs -- Force gdb to flush its register cache (maintainer command).
maintenance, mt -- Commands for use by GDB maintainers.
maintenance agent -- Translate an expression into remote agent bytecode for tracing.
maintenance agent-eval -- Translate an expression into remote agent bytecode for evaluation.
maintenance agent-printf -- Translate an expression into remote agent bytecode for evaluation and display the bytecodes.
maintenance btrace -- Branch tracing maintenance commands.
maintenance btrace clear -- Clears the branch tracing data.
maintenance btrace clear-packet-history -- Clears the branch tracing packet history.
maintenance btrace packet-history -- Print the raw branch tracing data.
maintenance check -- Commands for checking internal gdb state.
maintenance check xml-descriptions -- Check equality of GDB target descriptions and XML created descriptions.
maintenance check-psymtabs -- Check consistency of currently expanded psymtabs versus symtabs.
maintenance check-symtabs -- Check consistency of currently expanded symtabs.
maintenance cplus, maintenance cp -- C++ maintenance commands.
maintenance cplus first_component -- Print the first class/namespace component of NAME.
maintenance demangler-warning -- Give GDB a demangler warning.
maintenance deprecate -- Deprecate a command (for testing purposes).
maintenance dump-me -- Get fatal error; make debugger dump its core.
maintenance expand-symtabs -- Expand symbol tables.
maintenance flush-symbol-cache -- Flush the symbol cache for each program space.
maintenance info, maintenance i -- Commands for showing internal info about the program being debugged.
maintenance info bfds -- List the BFDs that are currently open.
maintenance info breakpoints -- Status of all breakpoints, or breakpoint number NUMBER.
maintenance info btrace -- Info about branch tracing data.
maintenance info line-table -- List the contents of all line tables, from all symbol tables.
maintenance info program-spaces -- Info about currently known program spaces.
maintenance info psymtabs -- List the partial symbol tables for all object files.
maintenance info sections -- List the BFD sections of the exec and core files.
maintenance info selftests -- List the registered selftests.
maintenance info symtabs -- List the full symbol tables for all object files.
maintenance internal-error -- Give GDB an internal error.
maintenance internal-warning -- Give GDB an internal warning.
maintenance packet -- Send an arbitrary packet to a remote target.
maintenance print -- Maintenance command for printing GDB internal state.
maintenance print architecture -- Print the internal architecture configuration.
maintenance print c-tdesc -- Print the current target description as a C source file.
maintenance print cooked-registers -- Print the internal register configuration including cooked values.
maintenance print core-file-backed-mappings -- Print core file's file-backed mappings.
maintenance print cuda_regmap -- Print GPUs register map table
maintenance print cuda_stats -- Print statistics about CUDA Debugger API.
maintenance print dummy-frames -- Print the contents of the internal dummy-frame stack.
maintenance print msymbols -- Print dump of current minimal symbol definitions.
maintenance print objfiles -- Print dump of current object file definitions.
maintenance print psymbols -- Print dump of current partial symbol definitions.
maintenance print raw-registers -- Print the internal register configuration including raw values.
maintenance print reggroups -- Print the internal register group names.
maintenance print register-groups -- Print the internal register configuration including each register's group.
maintenance print registers -- Print the internal register configuration.
maintenance print remote-registers -- Print the internal register configuration including remote register number and g/G packets offset.
maintenance print statistics -- Print statistics about internal gdb state.
maintenance print symbol-cache -- Dump the symbol cache for each program space.
maintenance print symbol-cache-statistics -- Print symbol cache statistics for each program space.
maintenance print symbols -- Print dump of current symbol definitions.
maintenance print target-stack -- Print the name of each layer of the internal target stack.
maintenance print type -- Print a type chain for a given symbol.
maintenance print user-registers -- List the names of the current user registers.
maintenance print xml-tdesc -- Print the current target description as an XML file.
maintenance selftest -- Run gdb's unit tests.
maintenance set -- Set GDB internal variables used by the GDB maintainer.
maintenance set ada -- Set Ada maintenance-related variables.
maintenance set ada ignore-descriptive-types -- Set whether descriptive types generated by GNAT should be ignored.
maintenance set bfd-sharing -- Set whether gdb will share bfds that appear to be the same file.
maintenance set btrace -- Set branch tracing specific variables.
maintenance set btrace pt -- Set Intel Processor Trace specific variables.
maintenance set btrace pt skip-pad -- Set whether PAD packets should be skipped in the btrace packet history.
maintenance set catch-demangler-crashes -- Set whether to attempt to catch demangler crashes.
maintenance set demangler-warning -- Configure what GDB does when demangler-warning is detected.
maintenance set demangler-warning quit -- Set whether GDB should quit when an demangler-warning is detected.
maintenance set dwarf -- Set DWARF specific variables.
maintenance set dwarf always-disassemble -- Set whether `info address' always disassembles DWARF expressions.
maintenance set dwarf max-cache-age -- Set the upper bound on the age of cached DWARF compilation units.
maintenance set dwarf unwinders -- Set whether the DWARF stack frame unwinders are used.
maintenance set internal-error -- Configure what GDB does when internal-error is detected.
maintenance set internal-error corefile -- Set whether GDB should create a core file of GDB when internal-error is detected.
maintenance set internal-error quit -- Set whether GDB should quit when an internal-error is detected.
maintenance set internal-warning -- Configure what GDB does when internal-warning is detected.
maintenance set internal-warning corefile -- Set whether GDB should create a core file of GDB when internal-warning is detected.
maintenance set internal-warning quit -- Set whether GDB should quit when an internal-warning is detected.
maintenance set per-command -- Per-command statistics settings.
maintenance set per-command space -- Set whether to display per-command space usage.
maintenance set per-command symtab -- Set whether to display per-command symtab statistics.
maintenance set per-command time -- Set whether to display per-command execution time.
maintenance set profile -- Set internal profiling.
maintenance set symbol-cache-size -- Set the size of the symbol cache.
maintenance set target-async -- Set whether gdb controls the inferior in asynchronous mode.
maintenance set target-non-stop -- Set whether gdb always controls the inferior in non-stop mode.
maintenance set test-settings -- Set GDB internal variables used for set/show command infrastructure testing.
maintenance set test-settings auto-boolean -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance set test-settings boolean -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance set test-settings enum -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance set test-settings filename -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance set test-settings integer -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance set test-settings optional-filename -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance set test-settings string -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance set test-settings string-noescape -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance set test-settings uinteger -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance set test-settings zinteger -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance set test-settings zuinteger -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance set test-settings zuinteger-unlimited -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance set worker-threads -- Set the number of worker threads GDB can use.
maintenance show -- Show GDB internal variables used by the GDB maintainer.
maintenance show ada -- Show Ada maintenance-related variables.
maintenance show ada ignore-descriptive-types -- Show whether descriptive types generated by GNAT should be ignored.
maintenance show bfd-sharing -- Show whether gdb will share bfds that appear to be the same file.
maintenance show btrace -- Show branch tracing specific variables.
maintenance show btrace pt -- Show Intel Processor Trace specific variables.
maintenance show btrace pt skip-pad -- Show whether PAD packets should be skipped in the btrace packet history.
maintenance show catch-demangler-crashes -- Show whether to attempt to catch demangler crashes.
maintenance show demangler-warning -- Show what GDB does when demangler-warning is detected.
maintenance show demangler-warning quit -- Show whether GDB will quit when an demangler-warning is detected.
maintenance show dwarf -- Show DWARF specific variables.
maintenance show dwarf always-disassemble -- Show whether `info address' always disassembles DWARF expressions.
maintenance show dwarf max-cache-age -- Show the upper bound on the age of cached DWARF compilation units.
maintenance show dwarf unwinders -- Show whether the DWARF stack frame unwinders are used.
maintenance show internal-error -- Show what GDB does when internal-error is detected.
maintenance show internal-error corefile -- Show whether GDB will create a core file of GDB when internal-error is detected.
maintenance show internal-error quit -- Show whether GDB will quit when an internal-error is detected.
maintenance show internal-warning -- Show what GDB does when internal-warning is detected.
maintenance show internal-warning corefile -- Show whether GDB will create a core file of GDB when internal-warning is detected.
maintenance show internal-warning quit -- Show whether GDB will quit when an internal-warning is detected.
maintenance show per-command -- Show per-command statistics settings.
maintenance show per-command space -- Show whether to display per-command space usage.
maintenance show per-command symtab -- Show whether to display per-command symtab statistics.
maintenance show per-command time -- Show whether to display per-command execution time.
maintenance show profile -- Show internal profiling.
maintenance show symbol-cache-size -- Show the size of the symbol cache.
maintenance show target-async -- Show whether gdb controls the inferior in asynchronous mode.
maintenance show target-non-stop -- Show whether gdb always controls the inferior in non-stop mode.
maintenance show test-options-completion-result -- Show maintenance test-options completion result.
maintenance show test-settings -- Show GDB internal variables used for set/show command infrastructure testing.
maintenance show test-settings auto-boolean -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance show test-settings boolean -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance show test-settings enum -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance show test-settings filename -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance show test-settings integer -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance show test-settings optional-filename -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance show test-settings string -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance show test-settings string-noescape -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance show test-settings uinteger -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance show test-settings zinteger -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance show test-settings zuinteger -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance show test-settings zuinteger-unlimited -- command used for internal testing.
maintenance show worker-threads -- Show the number of worker threads GDB can use.
maintenance space -- Set the display of space usage.
maintenance test-options -- Generic command for testing the options infrastructure.
maintenance test-options require-delimiter -- Command used for testing options processing.
maintenance test-options unknown-is-error -- Command used for testing options processing.
maintenance test-options unknown-is-operand -- Command used for testing options processing.
maintenance time -- Set the display of time usage.
maintenance translate-address -- Translate a section name and address to a symbol.
maintenance undeprecate -- Undeprecate a command (for testing purposes).
maintenance with -- Like "with", but works with "maintenance set" variables.

Command class: obscure

compare-sections -- Compare section data on target to the exec file.
compile, expression -- Command to compile source code and inject it into the inferior.
compile code -- Compile, inject, and execute code.
compile file -- Evaluate a file containing source code.
compile print -- Evaluate EXPR by using the compiler and print result.
complete -- List the completions for the rest of the line as a command.
guile, gu -- Evaluate a Guile expression.
guile-repl, gr -- Start a Guile interactive prompt.
monitor -- Send a command to the remote monitor (remote targets only).
python, py -- Evaluate a Python command.
python-interactive, pi -- Start an interactive Python prompt.
record, rec -- Start recording.
record btrace, record b -- Start branch trace recording.
record btrace bts, record bts -- Start branch trace recording in Branch Trace Store (BTS) format.
record btrace pt, record pt -- Start branch trace recording in Intel Processor Trace format.
record delete, record del, record d -- Delete the rest of execution log and start recording it anew.
record full -- Start full execution recording.
record full restore, record restore -- Restore the execution log from a file.
record function-call-history -- Prints the execution history at function granularity.
record goto -- Restore the program to its state at instruction number N.
record goto begin, record goto start -- Go to the beginning of the execution log.
record goto end -- Go to the end of the execution log.
record instruction-history -- Print disassembled instructions stored in the execution log.
record save -- Save the execution log to a file.
record stop, record s -- Stop the record/replay target.
stop -- There is no `stop' command, but you can set a hook on `stop'.

Command class: running

advance -- Continue the program up to the given location (same form as args for break command).
attach -- Attach to a process or file outside of GDB.
continue, fg, c -- Continue program being debugged, after signal or breakpoint.
detach -- Detach a process or file previously attached.
detach inferiors -- Detach from inferior ID (or list of IDS).
disconnect -- Disconnect from a target.
finish, fin -- Execute until selected stack frame returns.
handle -- Specify how to handle signals.
inferior -- Use this command to switch between inferiors.
interrupt -- Interrupt the execution of the debugged program.
jump, j -- Continue program being debugged at specified line or address.
kill -- Kill execution of program being debugged.
kill inferiors -- Kill inferior ID (or list of IDs).
next, n -- Step program, proceeding through subroutine calls.
nexti, ni -- Step one instruction, but proceed through subroutine calls.
queue-signal -- Queue a signal to be delivered to the current thread when it is resumed.
reverse-continue, rc -- Continue program being debugged but run it in reverse.
reverse-finish -- Execute backward until just before selected stack frame is called.
reverse-next, rn -- Step program backward, proceeding through subroutine calls.
reverse-nexti, rni -- Step backward one instruction, but proceed through called subroutines.
reverse-step, rs -- Step program backward until it reaches the beginning of another source line.
reverse-stepi, rsi -- Step backward exactly one instruction.
run, r -- Start debugged program.
signal -- Continue program with the specified signal.
start -- Start the debugged program stopping at the beginning of the main procedure.
starti -- Start the debugged program stopping at the first instruction.
step, s -- Step program until it reaches a different source line.
stepi, si -- Step one instruction exactly.
taas -- Apply a command to all threads (ignoring errors and empty output).
target -- Connect to a target machine or process.
target core -- Use a core file as a target.
target cudacore -- Use CUDA core file as a target.
target exec -- Use an executable file as a target.
target extended-remote -- Use a remote computer via a serial line, using a gdb-specific protocol.
target qnx -- Debug a remote machine using the QNX Debugging Protocol.
target record-btrace -- Collect control-flow trace and provide the execution history.
target record-core -- Log program while executing and replay execution from log.
target record-full -- Log program while executing and replay execution from log.
target remote -- Use a remote computer via a serial line, using a gdb-specific protocol.
target tfile -- Use a trace file as a target.
task -- Use this command to switch between Ada tasks.
tfaas -- Apply a command to all frames of all threads (ignoring errors and empty output).
thread, t -- Use this command to switch between threads.
thread apply -- Apply a command to a list of threads.
thread apply all -- Apply a command to all threads.
thread find -- Find threads that match a regular expression.
thread name -- Set the current thread's name.
until, u -- Execute until past the current line or past a LOCATION.

Command class: stack

backtrace, where, bt -- Print backtrace of all stack frames, or innermost COUNT frames.
down, dow, do -- Select and print stack frame called by this one.
faas -- Apply a command to all frames (ignoring errors and empty output).
frame, f -- Select and print a stack frame.
frame address -- Select and print a stack frame by stack address.
frame apply -- Apply a command to a number of frames.
frame apply all -- Apply a command to all frames.
frame apply level -- Apply a command to a list of frames.
frame function -- Select and print a stack frame by function name.
frame level -- Select and print a stack frame by level.
frame view -- View a stack frame that might be outside the current backtrace.
return -- Make selected stack frame return to its caller.
select-frame -- Select a stack frame without printing anything.
select-frame address -- Select a stack frame by stack address.
select-frame function -- Select a stack frame by function name.
select-frame level -- Select a stack frame by level.
select-frame view -- Select a stack frame that might be outside the current backtrace.
up -- Select and print stack frame that called this one.

Command class: status

info, inf, i -- Generic command for showing things about the program being debugged.
info address -- Describe where symbol SYM is stored.
info all-registers -- List of all registers and their contents, for selected stack frame.
info args -- All argument variables of current stack frame or those matching REGEXPs.
info auto-load -- Print current status of auto-loaded files.
info auto-load gdb-scripts -- Print the list of automatically loaded sequences of commands.
info auto-load local-gdbinit -- Print whether current directory .gdbinit file has been loaded.
info auto-load python-scripts -- Print the list of automatically loaded Python scripts.
info autosteps -- Status of autosteps, or autostep number NUMBER.
info auxv -- Display the inferior's auxiliary vector.
info bookmarks -- Status of user-settable bookmarks.
info breakpoints, info b -- Status of specified breakpoints (all user-settable breakpoints if no argument).
info classes -- All Objective-C classes, or those matching REGEXP.
info common -- Print out the values contained in a Fortran COMMON block.
info connections -- Target connections in use.
info copying -- Conditions for redistributing copies of GDB.
info cuda -- Print informations about the current CUDA activities. Available options:
info data-address -- Describe where the data for expression EXPR is stored.
info dcache -- Print information on the dcache performance.
info display -- Expressions to display when program stops, with code numbers.
info exceptions -- List all Ada exception names.
info extensions -- All filename extensions associated with a source language.
info files -- Names of targets and files being debugged.
info float -- Print the status of the floating point unit.
info frame, info f -- All about the selected stack frame.
info frame address -- Print information about a stack frame selected by stack address.
info frame function -- Print information about a stack frame selected by function name.
info frame level -- Print information about a stack frame selected by level.
info frame view -- Print information about a stack frame outside the current backtrace.
info frame-filter -- List all registered Python frame-filters.
info functions -- All function names or those matching REGEXPs.
info guile, info gu -- Prefix command for Guile info displays.
info inferiors -- Print a list of inferiors being managed.
info line -- Core addresses of the code for a source line.
info locals -- All local variables of current stack frame or those matching REGEXPs.
info macro -- Show the definition of MACRO, and it's source location.
info macros -- Show the definitions of all macros at LINESPEC, or the current source location.
info mem -- Memory region attributes.
info meminfo -- memory information
info module -- Print information about modules.
info module functions -- Display functions arranged by modules.
info module variables -- Display variables arranged by modules.
info modules -- All module names, or those matching REGEXP.
info os -- Show OS data ARG.
info pidlist -- List processes on the target.  Optional argument will filter out process names not containing (case insensitive) argument string.
info pretty-printer -- GDB command to list all registered pretty-printers.
info probes -- Show available static probes.
info probes all -- Show information about all type of probes.
info probes dtrace -- Show information about DTrace static probes.
info probes stap -- Show information about SystemTap static probes.
info proc -- Show additional information about a process.
info proc all -- List all available info about the specified process.
info proc cmdline -- List command line arguments of the specified process.
info proc cwd -- List current working directory of the specified process.
info proc exe -- List absolute filename for executable of the specified process.
info proc files -- List files opened by the specified process.
info proc mappings -- List memory regions mapped by the specified process.
info proc stat -- List process info from /proc/PID/stat.
info proc status -- List process info from /proc/PID/status.
info program -- Execution status of the program.
info record, info rec -- Info record options.
info registers, info r -- List of integer registers and their contents, for selected stack frame.
info scope -- List the variables local to a scope.
info selectors -- All Objective-C selectors, or those matching REGEXP.
info sharedlibrary, info dll -- Status of loaded shared object libraries.
info signals, info handle -- What debugger does when program gets various signals.
info skip -- Display the status of skips.
info source -- Information about the current source file.
info sources -- All source files in the program or those matching REGEXP.
info stack, info s -- Backtrace of the stack, or innermost COUNT frames.
info static-tracepoint-markers -- List target static tracepoints markers.
info symbol -- Describe what symbol is at location ADDR.
info target -- Names of targets and files being debugged.
info tasks -- Provide information about all known Ada tasks.
info terminal -- Print inferior's saved terminal status.
info threads -- Display currently known threads.
info tidinfo -- List threads for current process.
info tracepoints, info tp -- Status of specified tracepoints (all tracepoints if no argument).
info tvariables -- Status of trace state variables and their values.
info type-printers -- GDB command to list all registered type-printers.
info types -- All type names, or those matching REGEXP.
info unwinder -- GDB command to list unwinders.
info variables -- All global and static variable names or those matching REGEXPs.
info vector -- Print the status of the vector unit.
info vtbl -- Show the virtual function table for a C++ object.
info warranty -- Various kinds of warranty you do not have.
info watchpoints -- Status of specified watchpoints (all watchpoints if no argument).
info xmethod -- GDB command to list registered xmethod matchers.
macro -- Prefix for commands dealing with C preprocessor macros.
macro define -- Define a new C/C++ preprocessor macro.
macro expand, macro exp -- Fully expand any C/C++ preprocessor macro invocations in EXPRESSION.
macro expand-once, macro exp1 -- Expand C/C++ preprocessor macro invocations appearing directly in EXPRESSION.
macro list -- List all the macros defined using the `macro define' command.
macro undef -- Remove the definition of the C/C++ preprocessor macro with the given name.
show, info set -- Generic command for showing things about the debugger.
show ada -- Generic command for showing Ada-specific settings.
show ada print-signatures -- Show whether the output of formal and return types for functions in the overloads selection menu is activated.
show ada trust-PAD-over-XVS -- Show whether an optimization trusting PAD types over XVS types is activated.
show agent -- Show debugger's willingness to use agent as a helper.
show annotate -- Show annotation_level.
show architecture -- Show architecture of target.
show args -- Show argument list to give program being debugged when it is started.
show arm -- Various ARM-specific commands.
show arm abi -- Show the ABI.
show arm apcs32 -- Show usage of ARM 32-bit mode.
show arm disassembler -- Show the disassembly style.
show arm fallback-mode -- Show the mode assumed when symbols are unavailable.
show arm force-mode -- Show the mode assumed even when symbols are available.
show arm fpu -- Show the floating point type.
show auto-connect-native-target -- Show whether GDB may automatically connect to the native target.
show auto-load -- Show auto-loading specific settings.
show auto-load gdb-scripts -- Show whether auto-loading of canned sequences of commands scripts is enabled.
show auto-load local-gdbinit -- Show whether auto-loading .gdbinit script in current directory is enabled.
show auto-load python-scripts -- Show the debugger's behaviour regarding auto-loaded Python scripts.
show auto-load safe-path -- Show the list of files and directories that are safe for auto-loading.
show auto-load scripts-directory -- Show the list of directories from which to load auto-loaded scripts.
show auto-solib-add -- Show autoloading of shared library symbols.
show backtrace -- Show backtrace specific variables.
show backtrace limit -- Show the upper bound on the number of backtrace levels.
show backtrace past-entry -- Show whether backtraces should continue past the entry point of a program.
show backtrace past-main -- Show whether backtraces should continue past "main".
show basenames-may-differ -- Show whether a source file may have multiple base names.
show breakpoint -- Breakpoint specific settings.
show breakpoint always-inserted -- Show mode for inserting breakpoints.
show breakpoint auto-hw -- Show automatic usage of hardware breakpoints.
show breakpoint condition-evaluation -- Show mode of breakpoint condition evaluation.
show breakpoint conditional-pending -- Show debugger's behavior regarding pending breakpoints conditionals.
show breakpoint pending -- Show debugger's behavior regarding pending breakpoints.
show can-use-hw-watchpoints -- Show debugger's willingness to use watchpoint hardware.
show case-sensitive -- Show case sensitivity in name search (on/off/auto).
show charset -- Show the host and target character sets.
show check, show ch, show c -- Show the status of the type/range checker.
show check range -- Show range checking (on/warn/off/auto).
show check type -- Show strict type checking.
show circular-trace-buffer -- Show target's use of circular trace buffer.
show code-cache -- Show cache use for code segment access.
show coerce-float-to-double -- Show coercion of floats to doubles when calling functions.
show commands -- Show the history of commands you typed.
show compile-args -- Show compile command GCC command-line arguments.
show compile-gcc -- Show compile command GCC driver filename.
show complaints -- Show max number of complaints about incorrect symbols.
show configuration -- Show how GDB was configured at build time.
show confirm -- Show whether to confirm potentially dangerous operations.
show convenience, show conv -- Debugger convenience ("$foo") variables and functions.
show copying -- Conditions for redistributing copies of GDB.
show cp-abi -- Show the ABI used for inspecting C++ objects.
show cuda -- Generic command for showing gdb cuda variables
show cuda api_failures -- Show if cuda-gdb ignores/stops/hides on CUDA driver API call errors.
show cuda break_on_launch -- Show if the debugger stops the application on kernel launches.
show cuda coalescing -- Show if coalescing of the CUDA commands output is turned on/off.
show cuda collect_stats -- Show if CUDA Debugger API statistics collection is enabled.
show cuda context_events -- Show context events.
show cuda copyright -- Copyright for GDB with CUDA support.
show cuda device_resume_on_cpu_dynamic_function_call -- Show if resuming device during dynamic function call on host is enabled
show cuda disassemble_from -- Show where the device code is disassembled from.
show cuda disassemble_per -- Show if disassembly is per-function or per-file.
show cuda gpu_busy_check -- Show if GPU busy check on Darwin is turned on/off.
show cuda hide_internal_frame -- Show hiding of the internal CUDA frames when printing the call stack.
show cuda kernel_events -- Show kernel events.
show cuda kernel_events_depth -- Show the maximum depth of nested kernels event notifications.
show cuda launch_blocking -- Show whether CUDA kernel launches are blocking.
show cuda memcheck -- Show if CUDA Memory Checker is turned on/off.
show cuda notify -- Show which thread will be notified when a CUDA event occurs and no other thread is specified.
show cuda ptx_cache -- Show if GPU variable value cache is is turned on/off.
show cuda single_stepping_optimizations -- Show if CUDA single-stepping optimizations are enabled.
show cuda software_preemption -- Show if CUDA software preemption debugging is turned on/off.
show cuda stop_signal -- Show signal used to notify the debugger of the CUDA event
show cuda thread_selection -- Show the automatic thread selection policy to use when the current thread cannot be selected.
show cuda value_extrapolation -- Show if CUDA register value extrapolation is enabled.
show cwd -- Show the current working directory that is used when the inferior is started.
show data-directory -- Show GDB's data directory.
show dcache -- Show dcachesettings.
show dcache line-size -- Show dcache line size.
show dcache size -- Show number of dcache lines.
show debug -- Generic command for showing gdb debugging flags.
show debug aarch64 -- Show AArch64 debugging.
show debug arch -- Show architecture debugging.
show debug arm -- Show ARM debugging.
show debug auto-load -- Show auto-load verifications debugging.
show debug bfd-cache -- Show bfd cache debugging.
show debug check-physname -- Show cross-checking of "physname" code against demangler.
show debug coff-pe-read -- Show coff PE read debugging.
show debug compile -- Show compile command debugging.
show debug compile-cplus-scopes -- Show debugging of C++ compile scopes.
show debug compile-cplus-types -- Show debugging of C++ compile type conversion.
show debug cuda -- Generic command for showing gdb cuda debugging flags
show debug cuda convenience_vars -- Show use of extra convenience variables used for debugging.
show debug cuda libcudbg -- Show debug trace of the CUDA RPC client functions.
show debug cuda notifications -- Show debug trace of the CUDA notification functions.
show debug cuda strict -- Show the debugger execution mode.
show debug cuda trace -- Show debug trace of internal CUDA-specific functions.
show debug displaced -- Show displaced stepping debugging.
show debug dwarf-die -- Show debugging of the DWARF DIE reader.
show debug dwarf-line -- Show debugging of the dwarf line reader.
show debug dwarf-read -- Show debugging of the DWARF reader.
show debug entry-values -- Show entry values and tail call frames debugging.
show debug expression -- Show expression debugging.
show debug fortran-array-slicing -- Show debugging of Fortran array slicing.
show debug frame -- Show frame debugging.
show debug index-cache -- Show display of index-cache debug messages.
show debug infrun -- Show inferior debugging.
show debug jit -- Show JIT debugging.
show debug notification -- Show debugging of async remote notification.
show debug nto-debug -- Show QNX NTO internal debugging.
show debug observer -- Show observer debugging.
show debug overload -- Show debugging of C++ overloading.
show debug parser -- Show parser debugging.
show debug py-unwind -- Show Python unwinder debugging.
show debug record -- Show debugging of record/replay feature.
show debug remote -- Show debugging of remote protocol.
show debug remote-packet-max-chars -- Show the maximum number of characters to display for each remote packet.
show debug separate-debug-file -- Show printing of separate debug info file search debug.
show debug serial -- Show serial debugging.
show debug skip -- Show whether the debug output about skipping files and functions is printed.
show debug stap-expression -- Show SystemTap expression debugging.
show debug symbol-lookup -- Show debugging of symbol lookup.
show debug symfile -- Show debugging of the symfile functions.
show debug symtab-create -- Show debugging of symbol table creation.
show debug target -- Show target debugging.
show debug timestamp -- Show timestamping of debugging messages.
show debug varobj -- Show varobj debugging.
show debug xml -- Show XML parser debugging.
show debug-file-directory -- Show the directories where separate debug symbols are searched for.
show default-collect -- Show the list of expressions to collect by default.
show demangle-style -- Show the current C++ demangling style.
show detach-on-fork -- Show whether gdb will detach the child of a fork.
show directories -- Show the search path for finding source files.
show disable-randomization -- Show disabling of debuggee's virtual address space randomization.
show disassemble-next-line -- Show whether to disassemble next source line or insn when execution stops.
show disassembler-options -- Show the disassembler options.
show disconnected-dprintf -- Show whether dprintf continues after GDB disconnects.
show disconnected-tracing -- Show whether tracing continues after GDB disconnects.
show displaced-stepping -- Show debugger's willingness to use displaced stepping.
show dprintf-channel -- Show the channel to use for dynamic printf.
show dprintf-function -- Show the function to use for dynamic printf.
show dprintf-style -- Show the style of usage for dynamic printf.
show dump-excluded-mappings -- Show whether gcore should dump mappings marked with the VM_DONTDUMP flag.
show editing -- Show editing of command lines as they are typed.
show endian -- Show endianness of target.
show environment -- The environment to give the program, or one variable's value.
show exec-direction -- Show direction of execution (forward/reverse).
show exec-done-display -- Show notification of completion for asynchronous execution commands.
show exec-file-mismatch -- Show exec-file-mismatch handling (ask|warn|off).
show extended-prompt -- Show the extended prompt.
show extension-language -- Show mapping between filename extension and source language.
show filename-display -- Show how to display filenames.
show follow-exec-mode -- Show debugger response to a program call of exec.
show follow-fork-mode -- Show debugger response to a program call of fork or vfork.
show fortran -- Generic command for showing Fortran-specific settings.
show fortran repack-array-slices -- Show whether non-contiguous array slices are repacked.
show frame-filter -- Prefix command for 'show' frame-filter related operations.
show frame-filter priority -- GDB command to show the priority of the specified frame-filter.
show gnutarget -- Show the current BFD target.
show guile, show gu -- Prefix command for Guile preference settings.
show guile print-stack -- Show the mode of Guile exception printing on error.
show height -- Show number of lines in a page for GDB output pagination.
show history -- Generic command for showing command history parameters.
show history expansion -- Show history expansion on command input.
show history filename -- Show the filename in which to record the command history.
show history remove-duplicates -- Show how far back in history to look for and remove duplicate entries.
show history save -- Show saving of the history record on exit.
show history size -- Show the size of the command history.
show host-charset -- Show the host character set.
show index-cache -- Show index-cache options.
show index-cache directory -- Show the directory of the index cache.
show index-cache stats -- Show some stats about the index cache.
show inferior-tty -- Show terminal for future runs of program being debugged.
show input-radix -- Show default input radix for entering numbers.
show interactive-mode -- Show whether GDB's standard input is a terminal.
show language -- Show the current source language.
show listsize -- Show number of source lines gdb will list by default.
show logging -- Show logging options.
show logging debugredirect -- Show the logging debug output mode.
show logging file -- Show the current logfile.
show logging overwrite -- Show whether logging overwrites or appends to the log file.
show logging redirect -- Show the logging output mode.
show max-completions -- Show maximum number of completion candidates.
show max-user-call-depth -- Show the max call depth for non-python/scheme user-defined commands.
show max-value-size -- Show maximum sized value gdb will load from the inferior.
show may-call-functions -- Show permission to call functions in the program.
show may-insert-breakpoints -- Show permission to insert breakpoints in the target.
show may-insert-fast-tracepoints -- Show permission to insert fast tracepoints in the target.
show may-insert-tracepoints -- Show permission to insert tracepoints in the target.
show may-interrupt -- Show permission to interrupt or signal the target.
show may-write-memory -- Show permission to write into target memory.
show may-write-registers -- Show permission to write into registers.
show mem -- Memory regions settings.
show mem  inaccessible-by-default -- Show handling of unknown memory regions.
show mi-async, show target-async -- Show whether MI asynchronous mode is enabled.
show multiple-symbols -- Show how the debugger handles ambiguities in expressions.
show non-stop -- Show whether gdb controls the inferior in non-stop mode.
show nto-cwd -- Show current working directory for the remote process.
show nto-executable -- Show currently set binary to be executed on the remote QNX Neutrino target.
show nto-inherit-env -- Show nto-inherit-env value.
show nto-stop-on-thread-events -- Show stop on thread events setting.
show nto-timeout -- Show timeout value for communication with the remote.
show observer -- Show whether gdb controls the inferior in observer mode.
show opaque-type-resolution -- Show resolution of opaque struct/class/union types (if set before loading symbols).
show osabi -- Show OS ABI of target.
show output-radix -- Show default output radix for printing of values.
show overload-resolution -- Show overload resolution in evaluating C++ functions.
show pagination -- Show state of GDB output pagination.
show paths -- Current search path for finding object files.
show print, show pr, show p -- Generic command for showing print settings.
show print address -- Show printing of addresses.
show print array -- Show pretty formatting of arrays.
show print array-indexes -- Show printing of array indexes.
show print asm-demangle -- Show demangling of C++/ObjC names in disassembly listings.
show print demangle -- Show demangling of encoded C++/ObjC names when displaying symbols.
show print elements -- Show limit on string chars or array elements to print.
show print entry-values -- Show printing of function arguments at function entry.
show print finish -- Show whether `finish' prints the return value.
show print frame-arguments -- Show printing of non-scalar frame arguments.
show print frame-info -- Show printing of frame information.
show print inferior-events -- Show printing of inferior events (such as inferior start and exit).
show print max-depth -- Show maximum print depth for nested structures, unions, and arrays.
show print max-symbolic-offset -- Show the largest offset that will be printed in <SYMBOL+1234> form.
show print null-stop -- Show printing of char arrays to stop at first null char.
show print object -- Show printing of C++ virtual function tables.
show print pascal_static-members -- Show printing of pascal static members.
show print pretty -- Show pretty formatting of structures.
show print raw-frame-arguments -- Show whether to print frame arguments in raw form.
show print raw-values -- Show whether to print values in raw form.
show print repeats -- Show threshold for repeated print elements.
show print sevenbit-strings -- Show printing of 8-bit characters in strings as \nnn.
show print static-members -- Show printing of C++ static members.
show print symbol -- Show printing of symbol names when printing pointers.
show print symbol-filename -- Show printing of source filename and line number with <SYMBOL>.
show print symbol-loading -- Show printing of symbol loading messages.
show print thread-events -- Show printing of thread events (such as thread start and exit).
show print type -- Generic command for showing type-printing settings.
show print type methods -- Show printing of methods defined in classes.
show print type nested-type-limit -- Show the number of recursive nested type definitions to print.
show print type typedefs -- Show printing of typedefs defined in classes.
show print union -- Show printing of unions interior to structures.
show print vtbl -- Show printing of C++ virtual function tables.
show prompt -- Show gdb's prompt.
show python -- Prefix command for python preference settings.
show python print-stack -- Show the mode of Python stack printing on error.
show radix -- Show the default input and output number radices.
show range-stepping -- Show whether target-assisted range stepping is enabled.
show ravenscar -- Prefix command for showing Ravenscar-specific settings.
show ravenscar task-switching -- Show whether support for GNAT Ravenscar tasks is enabled.
show record, show rec -- Show record options.
show record btrace -- Show record options.
show record btrace bts -- Show record btrace bts options.
show record btrace bts buffer-size -- Show the record/replay bts buffer size.
show record btrace cpu -- Show the cpu to be used for trace decode.
show record btrace pt -- Show record btrace pt options.
show record btrace pt buffer-size -- Show the record/replay pt buffer size.
show record btrace replay-memory-access -- Show what memory accesses are allowed during replay.
show record full -- Show record options.
show record full insn-number-max, show record insn-number-max -- Show record/replay buffer limit.
show record full memory-query, show record memory-query -- Show whether query if PREC cannot record memory change of next instruction.
show record full stop-at-limit, show record stop-at-limit -- Show whether record/replay stops when record/replay buffer becomes full.
show record function-call-history-size -- Show number of functions to print in "record function-call-history".
show record instruction-history-size -- Show number of instructions to print in "record instruction-history".
show remote -- Remote protocol specific variables.
show remote CUDAVersion-packet-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `CUDAVersion packet' (CUDAVersion-packet) packet.
show remote TracepointSource-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `TracepointSource' (TracepointSource) packet.
show remote Z-packet -- Show use of remote protocol `Z' packets.
show remote access-watchpoint-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `Z4' (access-watchpoint) packet.
show remote agent-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QAgent' (agent) packet.
show remote allow-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QAllow' (allow) packet.
show remote attach-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vAttach' (attach) packet.
show remote binary-download-packet, show remote X-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `X' (binary-download) packet.
show remote breakpoint-commands-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `BreakpointCommands' (breakpoint-commands) packet.
show remote btrace-conf-bts-size-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `Qbtrace-conf:bts:size' (btrace-conf-bts-size) packet.
show remote btrace-conf-pt-size-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `Qbtrace-conf:pt:size' (btrace-conf-pt-size) packet.
show remote catch-syscalls-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QCatchSyscalls' (catch-syscalls) packet.
show remote conditional-breakpoints-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `ConditionalBreakpoints' (conditional-breakpoints) packet.
show remote conditional-tracepoints-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `ConditionalTracepoints' (conditional-tracepoints) packet.
show remote ctrl-c-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vCtrlC' (ctrl-c) packet.
show remote disable-btrace-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `Qbtrace:off' (disable-btrace) packet.
show remote disable-randomization-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QDisableRandomization' (disable-randomization) packet.
show remote enable-btrace-bts-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `Qbtrace:bts' (enable-btrace-bts) packet.
show remote enable-btrace-pt-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `Qbtrace:pt' (enable-btrace-pt) packet.
show remote environment-hex-encoded-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QEnvironmentHexEncoded' (environment-hex-encoded) packet.
show remote environment-reset-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QEnvironmentReset' (environment-reset) packet.
show remote environment-unset-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QEnvironmentUnset' (environment-unset) packet.
show remote exec-event-feature-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `exec-event-feature' (exec-event-feature) packet.
show remote exec-file -- Show the remote pathname for "run".
show remote fast-tracepoints-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `FastTracepoints' (fast-tracepoints) packet.
show remote fetch-register-packet, show remote p-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `p' (fetch-register) packet.
show remote fork-event-feature-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `fork-event-feature' (fork-event-feature) packet.
show remote get-thread-information-block-address-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qGetTIBAddr' (get-thread-information-block-address) packet.
show remote get-thread-local-storage-address-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qGetTLSAddr' (get-thread-local-storage-address) packet.
show remote hardware-breakpoint-limit -- Show the maximum number of target hardware breakpoints.
show remote hardware-breakpoint-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `Z1' (hardware-breakpoint) packet.
show remote hardware-watchpoint-length-limit -- Show the maximum length (in bytes) of a target hardware watchpoint.
show remote hardware-watchpoint-limit -- Show the maximum number of target hardware watchpoints.
show remote hostio-close-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vFile:close' (hostio-close) packet.
show remote hostio-fstat-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vFile:fstat' (hostio-fstat) packet.
show remote hostio-open-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vFile:open' (hostio-open) packet.
show remote hostio-pread-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vFile:pread' (hostio-pread) packet.
show remote hostio-pwrite-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vFile:pwrite' (hostio-pwrite) packet.
show remote hostio-readlink-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vFile:readlink' (hostio-readlink) packet.
show remote hostio-setfs-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vFile:setfs' (hostio-setfs) packet.
show remote hostio-unlink-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vFile:unlink' (hostio-unlink) packet.
show remote hwbreak-feature-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `hwbreak-feature' (hwbreak-feature) packet.
show remote install-in-trace-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `InstallInTrace' (install-in-trace) packet.
show remote interrupt-on-connect -- Show whether interrupt-sequence is sent to remote target when gdb connects to.
show remote interrupt-sequence -- Show interrupt sequence to remote target.
show remote kill-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vKill' (kill) packet.
show remote library-info-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:libraries:read' (library-info) packet.
show remote library-info-svr4-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:libraries-svr4:read' (library-info-svr4) packet.
show remote memory-map-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:memory-map:read' (memory-map) packet.
show remote memory-read-packet-size -- Show the maximum number of bytes per memory-read packet.
show remote memory-write-packet-size -- Show the maximum number of bytes per memory-write packet.
show remote multiprocess-feature-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `multiprocess-feature' (multiprocess-feature) packet.
show remote no-resumed-stop-reply-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `N stop reply' (no-resumed-stop-reply) packet.
show remote noack-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QStartNoAckMode' (noack) packet.
show remote osdata-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:osdata:read' (osdata) packet.
show remote pass-signals-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QPassSignals' (pass-signals) packet.
show remote pid-to-exec-file-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:exec-file:read' (pid-to-exec-file) packet.
show remote program-signals-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QProgramSignals' (program-signals) packet.
show remote query-attached-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qAttached' (query-attached) packet.
show remote read-aux-vector-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:auxv:read' (read-aux-vector) packet.
show remote read-btrace-conf-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:btrace-conf' (read-btrace-conf) packet.
show remote read-btrace-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:btrace' (read-btrace) packet.
show remote read-fdpic-loadmap-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:fdpic:read' (read-fdpic-loadmap) packet.
show remote read-sdata-object-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:statictrace:read' (read-sdata-object) packet.
show remote read-siginfo-object-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:siginfo:read' (read-siginfo-object) packet.
show remote read-watchpoint-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `Z3' (read-watchpoint) packet.
show remote reverse-continue-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `bc' (reverse-continue) packet.
show remote reverse-step-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `bs' (reverse-step) packet.
show remote run-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vRun' (run) packet.
show remote search-memory-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qSearch:memory' (search-memory) packet.
show remote set-register-packet, show remote P-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `P' (set-register) packet.
show remote set-working-dir-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QSetWorkingDir' (set-working-dir) packet.
show remote software-breakpoint-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `Z0' (software-breakpoint) packet.
show remote startup-with-shell-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QStartupWithShell' (startup-with-shell) packet.
show remote static-tracepoints-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `StaticTracepoints' (static-tracepoints) packet.
show remote supported-packets-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qSupported' (supported-packets) packet.
show remote swbreak-feature-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `swbreak-feature' (swbreak-feature) packet.
show remote symbol-lookup-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qSymbol' (symbol-lookup) packet.
show remote system-call-allowed -- Show if the host system(3) call is allowed for the target.
show remote target-features-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:features:read' (target-features) packet.
show remote thread-events-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QThreadEvents' (thread-events) packet.
show remote threads-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:threads:read' (threads) packet.
show remote trace-buffer-size-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `QTBuffer:size' (trace-buffer-size) packet.
show remote trace-status-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qTStatus' (trace-status) packet.
show remote traceframe-info-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:traceframe-info:read' (traceframe-info) packet.
show remote unwind-info-block-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:uib:read' (unwind-info-block) packet.
show remote verbose-resume-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vCont' (verbose-resume) packet.
show remote verbose-resume-supported-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vContSupported' (verbose-resume-supported) packet.
show remote vfork-event-feature-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `vfork-event-feature' (vfork-event-feature) packet.
show remote write-siginfo-object-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `qXfer:siginfo:write' (write-siginfo-object) packet.
show remote write-watchpoint-packet -- Show current use of remote protocol `Z2' (write-watchpoint) packet.
show remoteaddresssize -- Show the maximum size of the address (in bits) in a memory packet.
show remotecache -- Show cache use for remote targets.
show remoteflow -- Show use of hardware flow control for remote serial I/O.
show remotelogbase -- Show numerical base for remote session logging.
show remotelogfile -- Show filename for remote session recording.
show remotetimeout -- Show timeout limit to wait for target to respond.
show remotewritesize -- Show the maximum number of bytes per memory write packet (deprecated).
show schedule-multiple -- Show mode for resuming threads of all processes.
show scheduler-locking -- Show mode for locking scheduler during execution.
show script-extension -- Show mode for script filename extension recognition.
show serial -- Show default serial/parallel port configuration.
show serial baud -- Show baud rate for remote serial I/O.
show serial parity -- Show parity for remote serial I/O.
show solib-search-path -- Show the search path for loading non-absolute shared library symbol files.
show stack-cache -- Show cache use for stack access.
show step-mode -- Show mode of the step operation.
show stop-on-solib-events -- Show stopping for shared library events.
show style -- Style-specific settings.
show style address -- Address display styling.
show style address background -- Show the background color for this property.
show style address foreground -- Show the foreground color for this property.
show style address intensity -- Show the display intensity for this property.
show style enabled -- Show whether CLI is enabled.
show style filename -- Filename display styling.
show style filename background -- Show the background color for this property.
show style filename foreground -- Show the foreground color for this property.
show style filename intensity -- Show the display intensity for this property.
show style function -- Function name display styling.
show style function background -- Show the background color for this property.
show style function foreground -- Show the foreground color for this property.
show style function intensity -- Show the display intensity for this property.
show style highlight -- Highlight display styling.
show style highlight background -- Show the background color for this property.
show style highlight foreground -- Show the foreground color for this property.
show style highlight intensity -- Show the display intensity for this property.
show style metadata -- Metadata display styling.
show style metadata background -- Show the background color for this property.
show style metadata foreground -- Show the foreground color for this property.
show style metadata intensity -- Show the display intensity for this property.
show style sources -- Show whether source code styling is enabled.
show style title -- Title display styling.
show style title background -- Show the background color for this property.
show style title foreground -- Show the foreground color for this property.
show style title intensity -- Show the display intensity for this property.
show style tui-active-border -- TUI active border display styling.
show style tui-active-border background -- Show the background color for this property.
show style tui-active-border foreground -- Show the foreground color for this property.
show style tui-border -- TUI border display styling.
show style tui-border background -- Show the background color for this property.
show style tui-border foreground -- Show the foreground color for this property.
show style variable -- Variable name display styling.
show style variable background -- Show the background color for this property.
show style variable foreground -- Show the foreground color for this property.
show style variable intensity -- Show the display intensity for this property.
show substitute-path -- Show one or all substitution rules rewriting the source directories.
show sysroot, show solib-absolute-prefix -- Show the current system root.
show target-charset -- Show the target character set.
show target-file-system-kind -- Show assumed file system kind for target reported file names.
show target-wide-charset -- Show the target wide character set.
show tcp -- TCP protocol specific variables.
show tcp auto-retry -- Show auto-retry on socket connect.
show tcp connect-timeout -- Show timeout limit in seconds for socket connection.
show tdesc -- Show target description specific variables.
show tdesc filename -- Show the file to read for an XML target description.
show trace-buffer-size -- Show requested size of trace buffer.
show trace-commands -- Show state of GDB CLI command tracing.
show trace-notes -- Show the notes string to use for current and future trace runs.
show trace-stop-notes -- Show the notes string to use for future tstop commands.
show trace-user -- Show the user name to use for current and future trace runs.
show trust-readonly-sections -- Show mode for reading from readonly sections.
show unwind-on-terminating-exception -- Show unwinding of stack if std::terminate() is called while in a call dummy.
show unwindonsignal -- Show unwinding of stack if a signal is received while in a call dummy.
show upload-sets-exec -- Show nto-executable flag.
show use-coredump-filter -- Show whether gcore should consider /proc/PID/coredump_filter.
show use-deprecated-index-sections -- Show whether to use deprecated gdb_index sections.
show user -- Show definitions of non-python/scheme user defined commands.
show values -- Elements of value history around item number IDX (or last ten).
show varsize-limit -- Show the maximum number of bytes allowed in a variable-size object.
show verbose -- Show verbosity.
show version -- Show what version of GDB this is.
show warranty -- Various kinds of warranty you do not have.
show watchdog -- Show watchdog timer.
show width -- Show number of characters where GDB should wrap lines of its output.
show write -- Show writing into executable and core files.

Command class: support

add-auto-load-safe-path -- Add entries to the list of directories from which it is safe to auto-load files.
add-auto-load-scripts-directory -- Add entries to the list of directories from which to load auto-loaded scripts.
alias -- Define a new command that is an alias of an existing command.
apropos -- Search for commands matching a REGEXP.
define -- Define a new command name.  Command name is argument.
define-prefix -- Define or mark a command as a user-defined prefix command.
demangle -- Demangle a mangled name.
document -- Document a user-defined command.
dont-repeat -- Don't repeat this command.
down-silently -- Same as the `down' command, but does not print anything.
echo -- Print a constant string.  Give string as argument.
help, h -- Print list of commands.
if -- Execute nested commands once IF the conditional expression is non zero.
interpreter-exec -- Execute a command in an interpreter.
make -- Run the ``make'' program using the rest of the line as arguments.
new-ui -- Create a new UI.
overlay, ov, ovly -- Commands for debugging overlays.
overlay auto -- Enable automatic overlay debugging.
overlay list-overlays -- List mappings of overlay sections.
overlay load-target -- Read the overlay mapping state from the target.
overlay manual -- Enable overlay debugging.
overlay map-overlay -- Assert that an overlay section is mapped.
overlay off -- Disable overlay debugging.
overlay unmap-overlay -- Assert that an overlay section is unmapped.
pipe, | -- Send the output of a gdb command to a shell command.
quit, q -- Exit gdb.
shell, ! -- Execute the rest of the line as a shell command.
source -- Read commands from a file named FILE.
up-silently -- Same as the `up' command, but does not print anything.
while -- Execute nested commands WHILE the conditional expression is non zero.

Command class: tracepoints

actions -- Specify the actions to be taken at a tracepoint.
collect -- Specify one or more data items to be collected at a tracepoint.
end -- Ends a list of commands or actions.
passcount -- Set the passcount for a tracepoint.
tdump -- Print everything collected at the current tracepoint.
teval -- Specify one or more expressions to be evaluated at a tracepoint.
tfind -- Select a trace frame.
tfind end, tfind none -- De-select any trace frame and resume 'live' debugging.
tfind line -- Select a trace frame by source line.
tfind outside -- Select a trace frame whose PC is outside the given range (exclusive).
tfind pc -- Select a trace frame by PC.
tfind range -- Select a trace frame whose PC is in the given range (inclusive).
tfind start -- Select the first trace frame in the trace buffer.
tfind tracepoint -- Select a trace frame by tracepoint number.
tsave -- Save the trace data to a file.
tstart -- Start trace data collection.
tstatus -- Display the status of the current trace data collection.
tstop -- Stop trace data collection.
tvariable -- Define a trace state variable.
while-stepping, stepping, ws -- Specify single-stepping behavior at a tracepoint.

Command class: user-defined


Unclassified commands

add-inferior -- Add a new inferior.
clone-inferior -- Clone inferior ID.
eval -- Construct a GDB command and then evaluate it.
flash-erase -- Erase all flash memory regions.
function -- Placeholder command for showing help on convenience functions.
function _any_caller_is -- Check all calling function's names.
function _any_caller_matches -- Compare all calling function's names with a regexp.
function _as_string -- Return the string representation of a value.
function _caller_is -- Check the calling function's name.
function _caller_matches -- Compare the calling function's name with a regexp.
function _cimag -- Extract the imaginary part of a complex number.
function _creal -- Extract the real part of a complex number.
function _gdb_maint_setting -- $_gdb_maint_setting - returns the value of a GDB maintenance setting.
function _gdb_maint_setting_str -- $_gdb_maint_setting_str - returns the value of a GDB maintenance setting as a string.
function _gdb_setting -- $_gdb_setting - returns the value of a GDB setting.
function _gdb_setting_str -- $_gdb_setting_str - returns the value of a GDB setting as a string.
function _isvoid -- Check whether an expression is void.
function _memeq -- $_memeq - compare bytes of memory.
function _regex -- $_regex - check if a string matches a regular expression.
function _streq -- $_streq - check string equality.
function _strlen -- $_strlen - compute string length.
jit-reader-load -- Load FILE as debug info reader and unwinder for JIT compiled code.
jit-reader-unload -- Unload the currently loaded JIT debug info reader.
remove-inferiors -- Remove inferior ID (or list of IDs).
unset -- Complement to certain "set" commands.
unset environment -- Cancel environment variable VAR for the program.
unset substitute-path -- Delete one or all substitution rules rewriting the source directories.
unset tdesc -- Unset target description specific variables.
unset tdesc filename -- Unset the file to read for an XML target description.
(cuda-gdb) 

